Wisconsin, session 2025, AB449.
do enact as follows:AB449,11Section 1. 59.69 (16) of the statutes is created to read:AB449,2,8259.69 (16) Accessory dwelling units. (a) In this subsection, “accessory 3dwelling unit” means a residential dwelling unit that is located on the same parcel 4as an existing single-family dwelling and that provides complete independent living 5facilities for one or more persons and has an entrance separate from the existing 6single-family dwelling. An accessory dwelling unit may be within, attached to, or 7detached from a single-family dwelling and may be created by converting an 8existing structure.AB449,2,159(b) Notwithstanding sub. (4) and subject to par. (c), an ordinance under this 10section shall allow as a permitted use at least one accessory dwelling unit on each 11parcel that is zoned for residential use or mixed use on which an existing single-12family dwelling is located. Under this paragraph, a permitted use is a use of 13property that complies with all requirements of the zoning district in which the 14property is located and for which no conditional use, variance, or special review or 15approval is required for the accessory dwelling unit.AB449,2,1616(c) An ordinance under this section may do any of the following;AB449,2,18171. Limit the size of an accessory dwelling unit to not larger than the square 18footage of the existing single-family dwelling on the same parcel.AB449,3,2192. Limit the height of an accessory dwelling unit, other than an accessory 1dwelling unit that is a conversion of an existing legal nonconforming structure, to 2not greater than the maximum height permitted in the underlying zoning district.AB449,3,433. Require that an accessory dwelling unit satisfy current setback and lot 4coverage requirements.AB449,3,754. Notwithstanding s. 66.1014, prohibit the use of an accessory dwelling unit 6created on a parcel after the effective date of this subdivision .... [LRB inserts date], 7as a short-term rental, as defined in s. 66.0615 (1) (dk).AB449,28Section 2. 60.61 (3o) of the statutes is created to read:AB449,3,15960.61 (3o) Accessory dwelling units. (a) In this subsection, “accessory 10dwelling unit” means a residential dwelling unit that is located on the same parcel 11as an existing single-family dwelling and that provides complete independent living 12facilities for one or more persons and has an entrance separate from the existing 13single-family dwelling. An accessory dwelling unit may be within, attached to, or 14detached from a single-family dwelling and may be created by converting an 15existing structure.AB449,3,2216(b) Notwithstanding sub. (2) and subject to par. (c), an ordinance under this 17section shall allow as a permitted use at least one accessory dwelling unit on each 18parcel that is zoned for residential use or mixed use on which an existing single-19family dwelling is located. Under this paragraph, a permitted use is a use of 20property that complies with all requirements of the zoning district in which the 21property is located and for which no conditional use, variance, or special review or 22approval is required for the accessory dwelling unit.AB449,3,2323(c) An ordinance under this section may do any of the following;AB449,4,211. Limit the size of an accessory dwelling unit to not larger than the square 2footage of the existing single-family dwelling on the same parcel.AB449,4,532. Limit the height of an accessory dwelling unit, other than an accessory 4dwelling unit that is a conversion of an existing legal nonconforming structure, to 5not greater than the maximum height permitted in the underlying zoning district.AB449,4,763. Require that an accessory dwelling unit satisfy current setback and lot 7coverage requirements.AB449,4,1084. Notwithstanding s. 66.1014, prohibit the use of an accessory dwelling unit 9created on a parcel after the effective date of this subdivision .... [LRB inserts date], 10as a short-term rental, as defined in s. 66.0615 (1) (dk).AB449,311Section 3. 62.23 (7) (j) of the statutes is created to read:AB449,4,181262.23 (7) (j) Accessory dwelling units. 1. In this paragraph, “accessory 13dwelling unit” means a residential dwelling unit that is located on the same parcel 14as an existing single-family dwelling and that provides complete independent living 15facilities for one or more persons and has an entrance separate from the existing 16single-family dwelling. An accessory dwelling unit may be within, attached to, or 17detached from a single-family dwelling and may be created by converting an 18existing structure.AB449,5,2192. Notwithstanding par. (b) and subject to subd. 3., an ordinance under this 20section shall allow as a permitted use at least one accessory dwelling unit on each 21parcel that is zoned for residential use or mixed use on which an existing single-22family dwelling is located. Under this paragraph, a permitted use is a use of 23property that complies with all requirements of the zoning district in which the 1property is located and for which no conditional use, variance, or special review or 2approval is required for the accessory dwelling unit.AB449,5,333. An ordinance under this section may do any of the following;AB449,5,54a. Limit the size of an accessory dwelling unit to not larger than the square 5footage of the existing single-family dwelling on the same parcel.AB449,5,86b. Limit the height of an accessory dwelling unit, other than an accessory 7dwelling unit that is a conversion of an existing legal nonconforming structure, to 8not greater than the maximum height permitted in the underlying zoning district.AB449,5,109c. Require that an accessory dwelling unit satisfy current setback and lot 10coverage requirements.AB449,5,1311d. Notwithstanding s. 66.1014, prohibit the use of an accessory dwelling unit 12created on a parcel after the effective date of this subd. 3. d. .... [LRB inserts date], 13as a short-term rental, as defined in s. 66.0615 (1) (dk).AB449,414Section 4. Effective date.AB449,5,1615(1) This act takes effect on the first day of the 7th month beginning after 16publication.AB449,5,1717